Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 2 Licenses and Fees
57-3-218. Winemaking on premises facility license.

A winemaking on premises facility license may be issued as provided in this section for a business, located in a jurisdiction where the establishment of a winery is permitted pursuant to § 57-3-207, where individual customers who are twenty-one (21) years of age or older may purchase ingredients and rent the equipment, time, and space to manufacture wine, as defined in § 57-3-101, for personal use in an amount not to exceed the maximum amount that a private individual in that person's own home may manufacture pursuant to § 57-3-207(e). Any applicant for licensure under this section shall submit a verified, written application to the commission on the proper form authorized to be prescribed and furnished in this section, and the application may be granted by the commission, subject to the restrictions of this chapter. Subject to the limitations of subsection (b), any winemaking on premises facility license issued pursuant to this section shall authorize the holder of the license and the holder's customers to manufacture, but not rectify, wine, and the winemaking on premises facility license shall authorize the holder of the license and the holder's customers to place the wine in containers or bottles.

Except for wine produced in the process of testing equipment or recipes, and producing samples to be distributed pursuant to subdivision (b)(2), a license holder shall not personally manufacture wine that is not intended for the personal use of the license holder on the premises of the winemaking on premises facility. Nothing in this subdivision (b)(1) shall be construed to prohibit a license holder from assisting the license holder's customers who are engaged in the manufacture of wine on the premises of the facility.

A winemaking on premises facility licensed under this section may serve wine that is produced on the premises of the facility without charge as complimentary samples for tasting at the facility. Samples may be consumed at the premises only by a person who has a nonrefundable contract to manufacture at the premises, and the samples may not exceed one ounce (1 oz.) per sample. All wine produced at a winemaking on premises facility shall be removed from the premises by the customer or license holder who manufactured the wine and may only be used for home consumption and the personal use of the customer or license holder.

Each applicant for a winemaking on premises facility license issued pursuant to this section shall pay to the commission a one-time, nonrefundable fee in an amount to be determined by the commission when the application is submitted for review. The license shall not be issued until a license fee in an amount to be determined by the commission is paid to the commission by the winemaking on premises facility, but issuance of the license is exempt from the requirements of § 57-3-106. The commission shall deposit collections with the state treasurer to be earmarked for and allocated to the commission for the purpose of the administration and enforcement of the duties, powers and functions of the commission.

A winemaking on premises facility licensed under this section located in this state is authorized to sell the following items on the facility premises:

Juices or concentrates derived from juices, or any agricultural products;

Items used in home winemaking; and

Other gift, tourism, or wine-related items as defined by regulations duly promulgated by the commission.

Any wine transported from a winemaking on premises facility pursuant to this section must be accompanied by a bill of lading or other memorandum of shipment signed by the license holder for the facility where the wine was manufactured sufficiently identifying the nature, quantity, manufacturer, date and place of manufacture of the wine. Any person transporting such wine in excess of five gallons (5 gals.) shall have with the shipment a receipt or other documentation demonstrating that the wine was manufactured by the individual who is transporting the wine at a winemaking on premises facility as licensed in this section.

Any licensee or other person who sells, furnishes, disposes of, gives or causes to be sold, furnished, disposed of or given, any wine in this state or for transport into this state, to any person under the age of majority as established by § 57-4-203(b), commits a Class A misdemeanor.

The commission is empowered and authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the duties of the commission as provided in this section, including, but not limited to, procedures governing the production and transportation of wine.

It is the duty of the commissioner of agriculture to establish reasonable procedures requiring proper sanitary conditions about the winemaking on premises facility and to certify that these conditions have been met before the commission issues any license. The commissioner shall establish reasonable procedures requiring the process of manufacturing wine in a winemaking on premises facility to be carried on under proper sanitary conditions and in a sanitary manner; and for any failure to comply with the procedures, the commissioner shall notify the commission, which is authorized to revoke or suspend the license of any winemaking on premises facility.

If any provision of this section or application of this section to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the section that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to that end the provisions of this section are declared to be severable.

Acts 2011, ch. 451, § 2.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

57-3-219. Continuation of the issuance of licenses for the retail sale of alcoholic beverages for off-the-premises consumption in certain counties.

If, a smaller city located in a county having a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, retained its charter when the metropolitan form of government was adopted in such county; and

If, such city later by action of its governing body abolishes its charter and by such action becomes a part of the general services district of such county having a metropolitan form of government; and

If, while the charter of such smaller city was in existence, licenses were issued for the retail sale of alcoholic beverages for off-the-premises consumption; then:

Notwithstanding any provision of the charter of such metropolitan government to the contrary, licenses may continue to be issued for the retail sale of alcoholic beverages for off-the-premises consumption for those stores which were located within the municipal boundaries of the city while the charter was in force even though, once the charter is abolished, such area will be designated as being included in the general services district of such county.

Acts 2010, ch. 1133, § 6; T.C.A. §57-4-108.

Compiler's Notes. Former §57-4-108, concerning licenses that may be continue to be issued for certain retail sales of alcoholic beverages for off-premises consumption, was transferred to §57-3-219 in 2011 by the Tennessee Code Commission.

For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

57-3-220. License for military personnel living abroad to ship wine to this state.

Any individual who has been stationed outside the United States while serving as a member of the armed forces of the United States or a member of a reserve or Tennessee national guard unit may apply to the commission for a one-time license allowing such individual to ship any wine such individual has purchased while residing outside the United States to this state.

Each individual applying for a license under this section shall pay to the commission a one-time nonrefundable fee of one hundred dollars ($100). Each individual shall also pay the appropriate taxes required pursuant to § 57-3-302.

The commission shall create a form for issuing a license under this section. The form shall contain any information the commission deems necessary for allowing shipment under this section and for ensuring the individual pays the appropriate taxes.

Any individual who ships wine pursuant to this section is prohibited from reselling any wine shipped to this state.

Acts 2012, ch. 968, § 3.

57-3-221. Manager's permit.

There is created a manager's permit to be issued by the commission to any individual who will be in actual control of the alcohol, wine or beer operations of a retailer licensed under § 57-3-204, or a retail food store wine licensee.

An individual seeking a manager's permit shall make application for such permit by completing an application form in the manner prescribed by the commission. The individual must demonstrate that the individual meets the following requirements:

Has not been convicted of any crime involving the sale or distribution of alcohol over the previous eight (8) years;

Has not been convicted of any felony within the previous five (5) years;

Is at least eighteen (18) years of age;

Has not had an employee or server permit or any similar type permit issued by the state, any local jurisdiction, or any foreign jurisdiction revoked by any issuing authority within the previous three (3) years;

Does not hold any ownership interest in any licensee or permittee licensed pursuant to § 57-3-203, nor shall the individual have had any ownership interest in any licensee licensed under this title that has had its license revoked by the issuing authority within the previous eight (8) years; and

Has received training in alcohol awareness and the rules and regulations of the commission by an entity approved by the commission pursuant to § 57-3-705.

The manager's permit shall be valid for a period of five (5) years. The commission may impose a fee for the processing and cost of issuance of the manager's permit and for renewal of such permit. The fee shall be adequate for the commission to undertake an appropriate verification of the information provided by the applicant. This fee, which shall not exceed two hundred dollars ($200), shall be determined by the commission.

Manager's permits shall be required for the appropriate individuals at retailers licensed under § 57-3-204 and retail food store wine licensees.

Acts 2014, ch. 554, § 11; 2017, ch. 373, §§ 4, 5.

57-3-222. Minimum required sales for renewal of retail license — Recordkeeping — Suspension or revocation of license.

In order to renew a retail license, the licensee must maintain a minimum of sixty-five percent (65%) of the licensee's total sales from alcoholic beverages, including wine and beer, such percentage to be calculated on an annual basis. The licensee shall keep sales and purchase records through accounting methods that are customary or reasonable in the retail business.

A retail licensee who fails to comply with subsection (a) in achieving the minimum required sales or in failing to keep adequate records shall have one (1) year to come into compliance. During this one-year period, the licensee shall work with the commission in creating a plan that would bring the licensee into compliance with this section.

Failure to comply after the one-year period shall result in the retail license being suspended or revoked by the commission.

In order to determine compliance with subsection (a), each retail licensee shall submit sales information to the commission in such form as the commission deems appropriate at the time the licensee applies for renewal. The commission is authorized to verify sales information if the commission deems it necessary with the department of revenue.

Acts 2014, ch. 554, § 13.

57-3-223. Retail licensee permitted to also hold license to sell alcoholic beverages for consumption on premises — Requirements.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this title or any rule to the contrary, an individual or corporation may hold a retail license issued pursuant to §57-3-204 and may also hold a license to sell alcoholic beverages for consumption on premises pursuant to chapter 4 of this title; provided, however, that each license must be operated as a separate and distinct business and shall not be at the same location.

Acts 2014, ch. 554, § 16.

57-3-224. Delivery service license.

There is created a delivery service license to be issued by the commission to any delivery service that delivers or facilitates delivery of prepared food from restaurants or items from a retail store to customers as part of the delivery service's business and seeks to deliver sealed packages of alcoholic beverages or beer or both sold by any retailer licensed under this chapter, or an off-premises retail permittee licensed under § 57-5-103 as part of such delivery service. If a delivery service licensed under this section is delivering alcoholic beverages or beer purchased from a retailer in accordance with this subsection (a), the delivery service shall not deliver the alcoholic beverages or beer to a customer who resides or is located at the time of the delivery:

More than fifty (50) miles from the licensed premises of the retailer at which the alcoholic beverages or beer were purchased; or

In any county other than the county in which such retailer is located or a county contiguous to such county.

A delivery service includes, for purposes of this title, a technology services company that provides software or an application for connecting customers, retailers, or restaurants to a delivery driver. A delivery service does not include, and no license is required under this title to operate, a technology services company that does not employ or contract with delivery drivers but rather provides software or an application that connects retail licensees with consumers for the delivery of alcoholic beverages or beer from the retailer pursuant to § 57-3-406(j) or a company that ships wine pursuant to § 57-3-217. This section does not apply to a “motor carrier” or “freight forwarder” as those terms are defined in 49 U.S.C. § 13102, or to an “air carrier” as that term is defined in 49 U.S.C. § 40102.

Any person, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation desiring to deliver sealed packages of alcoholic beverages or beer sold by a retailer licensed under § 57-3-204 or an off-premise retail permittee licensed under § 57-5-103 as part of such delivery service shall make application to the commission for a delivery service license, which application shall be in writing and verified, on forms herein authorized to be prescribed and furnished; and the commission shall, subject to the restrictions of this section, issue such license.

Any person applying for a delivery service license shall be twenty-one (21) years of age or older and must not have been convicted of a felony as described in § 57-3-210(c).

The commission may issue a delivery service license to any person, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation that is registered to do business in this state regardless of the residence of the ownership of such entity.

Each applicant for a delivery service license shall pay to the commission a one-time, nonrefundable fee in the amount of three hundred dollars ($300) when the application is submitted for review. A delivery service license shall not be issued by the commission until the applicant pays the annual license fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

Each delivery service licensee shall conduct, or have a third party conduct, a local and national criminal background check on any potential employee or independent contractor that seeks to be licensed pursuant to § 57-3-225. Such background check shall include a multistate criminal records locator or other similar commercial nationwide database with validation.

It is the duty of each delivery service licensee to ensure that each employee or independent contractor, delivering alcoholic beverages or beer pursuant to § 57-3-406(k) for the licensee, is licensed pursuant to § 57-3-225.

A delivery service may use either employees or independent contractors as part of such delivery service. Any person delivering products for a delivery service shall comply with the provisions contained in § 57-3-225 related to delivery drivers in order to deliver alcoholic beverages or beer or both as provided in this section.

Acts 2015, ch. 285, § 2; 2016, ch. 1045, §§ 2, 3; 2016, ch. 1068, § 3; 2018, ch. 765, §§ 1-4.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment redesignated former (a) as present (a)(1) and added (a)(1)(A), (a)(1)(B) and (2); in the first sentence of present (a)(1), inserted “or facilitates delivery of” and “or items from a retail store”, substituted “any retailer licensed under this chapter, or an off-premises retail permittee” for “a retailer licensed under §57-3-204 or an off-premise retail permittee”, and deleted “at a distance greater than one hundred (100) miles from the licensed premises of the retailer at which the alcoholic beverages or beer was purchased” at the end; inserted “or independent contractor” in (d) and (e); and added (f).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 765, § 8. July 1, 2018.

57-3-225. Delivery employee license.

Beginning July 1, 2018, each delivery service licensed under § 57-3-224 shall be required to annually file a report stating the number of delivery drivers used by the delivery service to deliver alcoholic beverages, beer, or both, in the twelve (12) months preceding the date of the report. Each delivery service licensee shall maintain for each delivery driver covered by the licensee's delivery service license, records sufficient to verify the identity of each delivery driver, a copy of each delivery driver's license, and a copy of the background check conducted for that delivery driver pursuant to § 57-3-224(d).

Each delivery service licensee may employ or contract with any person meeting the following requirements:

Is at least twenty-one (21) years of age;

Has had a background check conducted pursuant to § 57-3-224(d) to ensure the individual has not been convicted of any crime involving the sale and distribution of alcohol within the previous seven (7) years or has not been convicted of any felony within the previous five (5) years; and

Has a valid driver license.

In addition to the annual license fee in § 57-3-224(c), a delivery service licensee shall pay a fee based on the total number of delivery service employees or independent contractors used by the delivery service licensee in the prior year. The fee shall be as follows:

0-15 delivery drivers — $50

16-30 delivery drivers — $100

31-45 delivery drivers — $150

46-60 delivery drivers — $200

61-100 delivery drivers — $250

101-150 delivery drivers — $300

151-200 delivery drivers — $350

Fifty dollars ($50.00) for each additional fifty (50) delivery drivers over two hundred (200) until a maximum of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

With respect to the delivery of alcoholic beverages, beer, or both pursuant to this chapter, a delivery service company may be subject to fines or the suspension or revocation of its license from the commission based on the conduct of a delivery driver. A retailer is not subject to a fine or the suspension or revocation of its license based on conduct of a delivery service driver after the driver picks up alcoholic beverages or beer from the retailer.

Acts 2015, ch. 285, § 2; 2016, ch. 1045, § 4; 2018, ch. 765, § 6.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment rewrote the section which read: “(a) Beginning July 1, 2015, there is created a delivery employee license to be issued by the commission to any individual employed by a person licensed pursuant to §57-3-224 who delivers alcoholic beverages or beer pursuant to §57-3-406(k).“(b) Any individual seeking a delivery employee license shall make application for such license by completing an application form in the manner prescribed by the commission. The individual shall demonstrate that the individual meets the following requirements:“(1) Is at least twenty-one (21) years of age;“(2) Has had a background check done pursuant to §57-3-224(d) to ensure the individual has not been convicted of any crime involving the sale or distribution of alcohol within the previous eight (8) years or has not been convicted of any felony within the previous five (5) years; and“(3) Has a valid driver license.“(c) Each individual applying for a license under this section shall pay to the commission a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00). Each delivery employee license shall be valid for a period of five (5) years.“(d) If an applicant does not meet the requirements of subsection (b), but is otherwise eligible for a delivery employee permit, then the applicant's application shall be initially denied pursuant to this subsection (d). Within thirty (30) days of such initial denial, the applicant may request a hearing to be held pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. At such hearing, the administrative law judge or hearing officer may consider any evidence the administrative law judge or hearing officer deems relevant to the matter and may, if in the administrative law judge's or hearing officer's judgment the principles of equity require, approve the application and grant the delivery employee permit, notwithstanding the requirements of subsection (b).“(e) If an applicant does not request a hearing pursuant to subsection (d) within the required period, then the application's denial will be final and the applicant shall not reapply for a delivery employee permit until five (5) years from the application's final denial. If a person applies for a delivery employee permit in violation of this subsection (e), then such application shall be denied and subsection (d) shall not apply.“(f) If the administrative law judge, hearing officer, or commission denies an application at a hearing held pursuant to subsection (d), then the application's denial will be final and the applicant shall not reapply for a delivery employee permit until five (5) years from the application's final denial. If a person applies for a delivery employee permit in violation of this subsection (f), then such application shall be denied and subsection (d) shall not apply.“(g) If a person is convicted of an offense described in subdivision (b)(2) after being issued a delivery employee permit pursuant to this section, the commission may institute proceedings to revoke the person's employee permit pursuant to §57-3-214; provided, that the administrative law judge or hearing officer may, if in the administrative law judge's or hearing officer's judgment the principles of equity require, refuse to revoke the person's delivery employee permit, notwithstanding a finding that the person has been convicted of an offense described in subdivision (b)(2). If the administrative law judge, hearing officer, or commission revokes a delivery employee permit pursuant to this subsection (g), then the applicant shall not reapply for a delivery employee permit until five (5) years from the revocation. If a person applies for a delivery employee permit in violation of this subsection (g), then such application shall be denied and subsection (d) shall not apply.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 765, § 8. July 1, 2018.